District of Columbia statutes.
16-1384

Condemnation of excess real property by United States agencies; payment of awards, damages and costs.

(a)

When excess real property is condemned by agencies of the United States as provided by this subchapter, the condemnation proceedings for the acquisition of the property shall be in accordance with subchapter IV of this chapter, or any laws in effect at the time of the commencement of condemnation proceedings for the acquisition of real property in the District of Columbia for the use of the United States.

(b)

Appropriations available for the condemnation of property pursuant to subchapter IV of this chapter may be used in the payment of awards, damages, and costs in condemnation proceedings pursuant to that subchapter for the acquisition of excess real property as provided in this subchapter.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 559, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(f)(13)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1384.
1973 Ed., § 16-1384.